test/src/morphology/N-kiindwr_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - kīndõr: # Noun 237 'eng /est küünar/fin' - full paradigm
     kīndõr+N+Sg+Nom: kīndõr
     kīndõr+N+Sg+Gen: kīndõr
     kīndõr+N+Sg+Par: kīndõrt
     kīndõr+N+Sg+Dat: kīndõrõn
     kīndõr+N+Sg+Ins: kīndõrõks
     kīndõr+N+Sg+Ill: kīndõrõ
     kīndõr+N+Sg+Ela: kīndõrõst
     kīndõr+N+Pl+Nom: kīndõrd
     kīndõr+N+Pl+Gen: kīndõrd
     kīndõr+N+Pl+Par: kīndõri
     kīndõr+N+Pl+Dat: kīndõrdõn
     kīndõr+N+Pl+Ins: kīndõrdõks
     kīndõr+N+Pl+Ill: kīndiriž
     kīndõr+N+Pl+Ela: kīndõrist
